District of Columbia statutes.
1-606.10

Public hearings.

(a)

Hearings shall be open to the public. However, the Hearing Examiner may order a hearing or any part of a hearing closed if to do so would be in the best interest of the appellant, a witness, the public, or any other affected person. An order closing the hearing shall set forth the reasons for the Hearing Examiner’s decision. Any objection to closing the hearing shall be made part of the record.

(b)

A vote or decision on the appeal by the Office shall be made in public, pursuant to § 1-207.42.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 609
as added May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-127, § 2(e), 37 DCR 2093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-606.10.